Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-2227
State WIC program; authorized; department; powers.

The Department of Health and Human Services is authorized to have a state WIC program to protect the health and welfare of citizens of Nebraska by providing nutritional supplemental foods and nutrition education to women, infants, and children who are low income and determined to be at nutritional risk as long as federal funds are available from the WIC program and are granted to the department.

To the extent consistent with state law, the department may establish, operate, and maintain the program in a way that will qualify it to receive federal funds and that is uniform with United States Department of Agriculture's standards, enter into agreements with the federal government to establish a WIC program, adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to implement a WIC program which are consistent with federal regulations and such other rules and regulations as may be necessary to implement the WIC program, and enter into such other agreements as may be necessary to implement the program within this state.

Laws 1987, LB 643, § 19;

Laws 1989, LB 344, § 23;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 620.